Washington statutes.
RCW 41.68.050

Payment of reparation.

A claimant under this chapter who is determined eligible by the department of enterprise services shall receive two thousand five hundred dollars each year for two years. All claims which the department determines are eligible for reparation shall be immediately forwarded to the state treasurer, who shall issue warrants in the appropriate amounts upon demand and verification of identity. If a claimant dies after filing a claim but before receiving full payment, payments shall be made to the claimant's estate upon demand and verification of identity.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 476; 1983 1st ex.s. c 15 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.